Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301B of Title 44, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Military Department to be designated the "Base
Infrastructure Needs and Development - Schools Revolving Fund",
which may also be cited as "BIND – Schools Fund". The fund shall be
a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies directed for deposit to the fund by law. All
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2516 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

moni es accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Military Department
for the purpose established in subsection B of this section.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
B. There is hereby established within the Oklahoma Military
Department the "Base Infrastructure Needs and Development – Schools
Program", which may also be cited as the "BIND – Schools Program".
The Department shall utilize funds from the BIND – Schools Fund
created in subsection A of this section, alone or in combination
with other available funding, to make infrastructure investments,
including, but not limited to, new construction, improving common
education facilities located on military bases in this state, that
will either:
1. Decrease the likelihood of military base and other military
infrastructure closures in this state, or
2. Increase the likelihood of military base and other military
infrastructure expansions in this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2516 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 23, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2516 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)